Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF67.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1579YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 67 Section 1. SCHOOL CALENDAR FOR 2025-2026 SCHOOL 1 YEAR. Notwithstanding the requirement in section 279.10, 2 subsection 1, that the school calendar for school districts and 3 accredited nonpublic schools shall begin no sooner than August 4 23, during the school year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 5 June 30, 2026, the school calendar for school districts and 6 accredited nonpublic schools shall begin no sooner than August 7 20. 8